Hawaii statutes.
§180-16 Budget. The department of land
and natural resources shall submit to the director of finance, annually the
budgetary estimates and information required by chapter 37, and shall include
therein estimates of the financial requirements of the department. All
contributions, moneys, and funds received by any district shall be deposited to
the credit of the state general fund. [L 1947, c 191, §10; RL 1955, §28-19; am
L Sp 1959 1st, c 13, §2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§14, 22; am L 1961, c 132, §2;
am L 1963, c 114, §1; am L 1967, c 145, §§1, 2; HRS §180-16; am L 1993, c 280,
§51]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next